Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-203 General qualifications for
license. (a) For the protection of the public, the commissioner shall not
issue or extend any license for an adjuster or independent bill reviewer:

(1) Except as provided by this article; or

(2) To any individual less than eighteen years of
age.

(b) An applicant for a license under this
article shall notify the commissioner of the applicant's legal name and trade
name, if applicable. An applicant doing business under any name other than
[the] applicant's legal name shall notify the commissioner prior to using the
assumed name.

(c) A licensee shall:

(1) Inform the commissioner by any means acceptable
to the commissioner of any change of status within thirty days of the change;
and

(2) Report any change of status to the business
registration division if the licensee is a business entity registered with the
department of commerce and consumer affairs pursuant to title 23 or title 23A,
or if the licensee has registered a trade name pursuant to part II of chapter 482.

Failure to timely inform the commissioner or
business registration division of a change of status shall result in a penalty
pursuant to section 431:2-203.

(d) As used in this section, "change of
status" includes but shall not be limited to change of legal name, assumed
name, trade name, business address, home address, mailing address, business
phone number, business fax number, business electronic mail address, business
website address, or home phone number. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2006, c
154, §16; am L 2010, c 116, §1(5); am L 2011, c 43, §14]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next